Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-520
Applicant; employment order; contents; reimburse transportation costs, when.

No private employment agency shall send out any applicant for employment without having a bona fide employment order on file which shall state the name and address of the prospective employer, the name of the individual authorizing the order, and the title, duties and salary range of the position, and stating who shall pay the service fee. If it shall appear that no employment of the kind applied for existed at the place where such applicant was directed, such licensee shall reimburse such applicant, within five days after demand, for any sum paid by such applicant for transportation in going to and returning from such place.

Laws 1972, LB 1460, § 9;

Laws 1977, LB 162, § 16.